Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8243. LANNIUS MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8243.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Lannius Municipal Utility District.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8243.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Fannin County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8243.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the boundaries of the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8243.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 2, Chapter 620, Acts of the 63rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1973, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in copying the field notes in the legislative process or another mistake in the field notes does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to issue any type of bond for a purpose for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on the bond;

(3) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8243.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board of directors is composed of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS

Sec. 8243.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions conferred and imposed by general law applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8243.102. WATER AND SEWER SYSTEMS. The district may:

(1) acquire an existing water system that serves all or part of the district territory; or

(2) enter into a contract with the owner of a system described by Subdivision (1) under which the owner agrees:

(A) to operate and maintain all or part of the district's facilities;

(B) to provide billing for utility service supplied by district facilities;

(C) not to provide water service to a customer who is subject to the sanitary sewer service supplied by district facilities but who has not paid for that sewer service; and

(D) to any other agreement required to assure adequate maintenance of district facilities and provide money to pay district obligations.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.